Wyoming statutes. Title 40 Trade and Commerce
Part 3. Criminal Penalties

§ 40-14-540.
Willful violations.

A person who makes a consumer loan and who willfully makes charges in excess of those permitted by the provisions of the article on loans (article 3) is guilty of a misdemeanor and upon conviction may be sentenced to pay a fine not exceeding one thousand dollars ($1,000.00), or to imprisonment not exceeding six (6) months, or both.

A person, other than a supervised financial organization, who willfully engages in the business of making consumer loans without a license in violation of W.S.

40-14-302

is guilty of a misdemeanor and upon conviction may be sentenced to pay a fine not exceeding five thousand dollars ($5,000.00), or to imprisonment not exceeding one (1) year, or both.

A person who willfully engages in the business of making consumer credit sales, consumer leases, or consumer loans, or of taking assignments of rights against debtors arising therefrom and undertakes direct collection of payments or enforcement of these rights, without complying with the provisions of this act concerning notification (W.S.

40-14-631

) or payment of fees (W.S.

40-14-632

), is guilty of a misdemeanor and upon conviction may be sentenced to pay a fine not exceeding one thousand dollars ($1,000.00).

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 191, § 5-301; W.S. 1957, § 40-5-301; 2021 ch. 14, § 2, effective July 1, 2021.

The 2021 amendment,

effective July 1, 2021, in (a), substituted "person who makes a consumer loan and" for "supervised lender" and deleted "applying to supervised loans (part 5)" for "(article 3)"; in (b), substituted "consumer" for "supervised" following "of making" and "W.S.

40-14-302

" for "the provisions of this act applying to authority to make supervised loans (W.S.

40-14-342

)."

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see
§ 40-14-140(a)(xxv).

§ 40-14-541.
Disclosure violations.

A person is guilty of a misdemeanor and upon conviction may be sentenced to pay a fine not exceeding five thousand dollars ($5,000.00), or to imprisonment not exceeding one (1) year, or both, if he willfully and knowingly:

Gives false or inaccurate information or fails to provide information which he is required to disclose under the provisions of this act on disclosure and advertising (part 3) of the article on credit sales (article 2) or of the article on loans (article 3), or of any related rule of the administrator adopted pursuant to this act;

Uses any rate table or chart, the use of which is authorized by rule of the administrator adopted pursuant to the provisions on calculation of rate to be disclosed (W.S.

40-14-225

and

40-14-323

), in a manner which consistently understates the annual percentage rate determined according to those provisions; or

Otherwise fails to comply with any requirement of provisions of this act on disclosure and advertising (part 3) of the article on credit sales (article 2) or of the article on loans (article 3), or of any related rule of the administrator adopted pursuant to this act.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 191, § 5-302; W.S. 1957, § 40-5-302.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see
§ 40-14-140(a)(xxv).